North Dakota, session 69, SB2216.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 20.1-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Waterfowl habitat improvement fund.
There is created in the state treasury a special fund known as the waterfowl habitat improvement
fund. The fund consists of transfers and deposits made in accordance with section 2 of this Act and
interest earned on moneys in the fund. Moneys in the fund may be expended, subject to legislative
appropriations, for improving or restoring waterfowl habitat and supporting youth hunting programs,
including providing a match for federal funding obtained by the department.
SECTION 2. A new section to chapter 20.1-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Waterfowl habitat restoration electronic stamp required - Use of revenue.
A waterfowl habitat restoration electronic stamp is required for every resident and nonresident to
hunt waterfowl within the state for which an electronic stamp fee of five dollars must be charged. All
money generated by the waterfowl habitat restoration electronic stamp fees must be placed in the
waterfowl habitat improvement fund.

S. B. NO. 2216 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2216.
Senate Vote: Yeas 39 Nays 6 Absent 2
House Vote: Yeas 67 Nays 26 Absent 1
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State